Washington statutes.
RCW 9.72.090

Committal of witness—Detention of documents.

Whenever it shall appear probable to a judge, magistrate, or other officer lawfully authorized to conduct any hearing, proceeding or investigation, that a person who has testified before such judge, magistrate, or officer has committed perjury in any testimony so given, or offered any false evidence, he or she may, by order or process for that purpose, immediately commit such person to jail or take a recognizance for such person's appearance to answer such charge. In such case such judge, magistrate, or officer may detain any book, paper, document, record or other instrument produced before him or her or direct it to be delivered to the prosecuting attorney.

[ 1987 c 202 s 141; 1909 c 249 s 107; RRS s 2359.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.